California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) The franchisor and the franchisee fail to agree to changes or additions to the terms and conditions of the franchise agreement, if such changes or additions would result in renewal of the franchise agreement on substantially the same terms and conditions on which the franchisor is then customarily granting renewal franchises, or if the franchisor is not then granting a significant number of renewal franchises, the terms and conditions on which the franchisor is then customarily granting original franchises. The franchisor may give the franchisee written notice of a date which is at least 30 days from the date of such notice, on or before which a proposed written agreement of the terms and conditions of the renewal franchise shall be accepted in writing by the franchisee. Such notice, when given not less than 180 days before the end of the franchise term, may state that in the event of failure of such acceptance by the franchisee, the notice shall be deemed a notice of intention not to renew at the end of the franchise term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20026.

Nothing in Section 20025 shall prohibit a franchisor from offering or agreeing before expiration of the current franchise term to extend the term of the franchise for a limited period in order to satisfy the time of notice of nonrenewal requirement of that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.4. Transfers [20027. - 20029.]

20027.

(a) No franchisor shall deny the surviving spouse, heirs, or estate of a deceased franchisee or the majority shareholder of the franchisee the opportunity to participate in the ownership of the franchise under a valid franchise agreement for a reasonable time after the death of the franchisee or majority shareholder of the franchisee. During that time the surviving spouse, heirs, or estate of the deceased shall either satisfy all of the then current qualifications for a purchaser of a franchise or sell, transfer, or assign the franchise to a person who satisfies the franchisor’s then current standards for new franchisees. The rights granted pursuant to this section shall be granted subject to the surviving spouse, heirs or estate of the deceased maintaining all standards and obligations of the franchise.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prohibit a franchisor from exercising the right of first refusal to purchase a franchise after receipt of a bona fide offer to purchase the franchise by a proposed purchaser of the franchise.

(c) This article shall not apply to any agreement or contract in effect prior to January 1, 1984, except an agreement or contract of an indefinite duration. This section shall not apply to any bequest or intestate succession that took effect prior to January 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20028.

(a) It is unlawful for a franchisor to prevent a franchisee from selling or transferring a franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of the franchise business, or a controlling or noncontrolling interest in the franchise business, to another person provided that the person is qualified under the franchisor’s then-existing standards for the approval of new or renewing franchisees, these standards to be made available to the franchisee, as provided in Section 20029, and to be consistently applied to similarly situated franchisees operating within the franchise brand, and the franchisee and the buyer, transferee, or assignee comply with the transfer conditions specified in the franchise agreement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a franchisee shall not have the right to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of the franchise business, or a controlling or noncontrolling interest in the franchise business, without the written consent of the franchisor, except that the consent shall not be withheld unless the buyer, transferee, or assignee does not meet the standards for new or renewing franchisees described in subdivision (a) or the franchisee and the buyer, transferee, or assignee do not comply with the transfer conditions specified in the franchise agreement.

(c) This section does not prohibit a franchisor from exercising the contractual right of first refusal to purchase a franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of a franchise business, or a controlling or noncontrolling interest in a franchise business after receipt of a bona fide offer from a proposed purchaser to
 purchase the franchise, assets, or interest. A franchisor exercising the contractual right of first refusal shall offer the seller payment at least equal to the value offered in the bona fide offer.

(d) For the purpose of this section “franchise business” shall include a legal entity that is a party to a franchise agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 4.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20029.

(a) The franchisee shall, prior to the sale, assignment, or transfer of a franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of a franchise business, or a controlling or noncontrolling interest in the franchise business, to another person, notify the franchisor, of the franchisee’s intent to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of the franchise business, or the controlling or noncontrolling interest in the franchise business. The notice shall be in writing, delivered to the franchisor by business courier or by receipted mail and include all of the following:

(1) The proposed transferee’s name and address.

(2) A copy of all agreements related to the sale, assignment, or transfer of the franchise, the assets of the franchise business, or the interest in the franchise business.

(3) The proposed transferee’s application for approval to become the successor franchisee. The application shall include all forms, financial disclosures, and related information generally utilized by the franchisor in reviewing prospective new franchisees, if those forms are readily made available to the existing franchisee. If the forms are not readily available, the franchisee shall request and the franchisor shall deliver the forms to the franchisee by business courier or receipted mail within 15 calendar days. As soon as practicable after the receipt of the proposed transferee’s application, the franchisor shall notify, in writing, the franchisee and the proposed transferee of any additional information or documentation necessary to complete the transfer
 application. If the franchisor’s then-existing standards for the approval of new or renewing franchisees are not readily available to the franchisee when the franchisee notifies the franchisor of the franchisee’s intent to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise, the assets of the franchise business, or the controlling or noncontrolling interest in the franchise business, the franchisor shall communicate the standards to the franchisee within 15 calendar days.

(b) (1) The franchisor shall, within 60 days after the receipt of all of the necessary information and documentation required pursuant to subdivision (a), or as specified by written agreement between the franchisor and the franchisee, notify the franchisee of the approval or disapproval of the proposed sale, assignment, or transfer. The notice shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the franchisee by business courier or receipted mail. A proposed sale,
 assignment, or transfer shall be deemed approved, unless disapproved by the franchisor in the manner provided by this subdivision. If the proposed sale, assignment, or transfer is disapproved, the franchisor shall include in the notice of disapproval a statement setting forth the reasons for the disapproval.

(2) In any action in which the franchisor’s disapproval of a sale, assignment, or transfer pursuant to this subdivision is an issue, the reasonableness of the franchisor’s decision shall be a question of fact requiring consideration of all existing circumstances. For purposes of this paragraph, the finder of fact may be an arbitrator specified in the franchise agreement and who satisfies the requirements of Section 20040. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit summary judgment when the reasonableness of transfer approval or disapproval can be decided as a matter of law.

(3) This section does not require a franchisor to exercise a contractual right of first refusal.

(c) This section does not prohibit a franchisor from exercising the contractual right of first refusal to purchase a franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of a franchise business, or a controlling or noncontrolling interest in a franchise business after receipt of a bona fide offer from a proposed purchaser to purchase the franchise, assets, or interest. Any franchisor exercising the contractual right of first refusal shall offer the seller payment at least equal to the value offered in the bona fide offer.

(d) For the purpose of this section “franchise business” shall include a legal entity that is a party to a franchise agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 5.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Notices [20030. - 20030.]

20030.

All notices of termination or nonrenewal required by this chapter:

(a) Shall be in writing;

(b) Shall be posted by registered, certified or other receipted mail, delivered by telegram or personally delivered to the franchisee; and

(c) Shall contain a statement of intent to terminate or not renew the franchise:

(1) Together with the reasons therefor, and

(2) The effective date of such termination or nonrenewal or expiration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Remedies [20035. - 20037.]

20035.

(a) In the event a franchisor terminates or fails to renew a franchisee, in violation of this chapter, the franchisee shall be entitled to receive from the franchisor the fair market value of the franchised business and franchise assets and any other damages caused by the violation of this chapter.

(b) A court may grant preliminary and permanent injunctions for a violation or threatened violation of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 8.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20036.

The franchisor may offset against any remedies made pursuant to Section 20035 any prior recovery by the franchisee pursuant to Section 20022 and any sums owed the franchisor or its subsidiaries by the franchisee pursuant to the franchise or any ancillary agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 9.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20037.

Except as expressly provided herein, nothing in this article shall abrogate the right of a franchisee to sue under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Arbitration [20040. - 20040.]

20040.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the right of a franchisor and franchisee to agree before or after a dispute has arisen to binding arbitration of claims under this chapter, provided that:

(a) The standards applied in such arbitration are not less than the requirements specified in this chapter; and

(b) The arbitrator or arbitrators employed in such arbitration are chosen from a list of impartial arbitrators supplied by the American Arbitration Association or other impartial person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Venue of Disputes [20040.5. - 20040.5.]

20040.5.

A provision in a franchise agreement restricting venue to a forum outside this state is void with respect to any claim arising under or relating to a franchise agreement involving a franchise business operating within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Miscellaneous Provisions [20041. - 20044.]

20041.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the provisions of this chapter shall apply only to franchises granted or renewed on or after January 1, 1981, or to franchises of an indefinite duration that may be terminated by the franchisee or franchisor without cause.

(b) The amendments to this chapter made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply only to franchise agreements entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, or to franchises of an indefinite duration that may be terminated by the franchisee or franchisor without cause.

(c) The amendments to this chapter made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply only to franchise agreements entered into, amended, or renewed on or after
 January 1, 2023, or to franchises of an indefinite duration that may be terminated by the franchisee or franchisor without cause, except that a franchise agreement amended after January 1, 2023, shall not be subject to the amendments to this chapter made by the act adding this subdivision if the amendment to the franchise agreement was initiated by the franchisee and did not substantially and adversely impact the franchisee’s rights, benefits, privileges, duties, obligations, or responsibilities under the franchise agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

20042.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to franchises governed by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 3060) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Vehicle Code which contain the sole remedies for the matters contained therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20043.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20044.

A franchisor is prohibited from modifying a franchise agreement, or requiring a general release, in exchange for any assistance related to a declared state or federal emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 4.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Paints [20500. - 20502.]

20500.

No person shall within this State manufacture for sale, offer for sale or sell any article, mixture, compound or substance, used in making paints, oils, varnishes or pigments, which is adulterated within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

20501.

An article under this chapter is adulterated within the meaning of this chapter:

(a) In case of oils, turpentines, alcohol or other vehicles under any of the following circumstances:

(1) If it contains any other substance or ingredient different from the article under the name of which it is offered for sale or sold.

(2) If any substance has been mixed with it so as to lower, depreciate or injuriously affect the quality, strength or purity of the article.

(3) If any inferior or cheaper substance or substances have been substituted wholly or in part for it.

(4) If it is an imitation, or is sold under the name of any other article.

(b) In case of lead, zinc, ocher or other metal, mineral or chemical paints, or any or other pigments in paste form and labeled pure, used in the painting or decorating industry under any of the following circumstances:

(1) If any substance which lowers, depreciates or injuriously affects the quality, strength or purity of the article has been mixed with it, or substituted wholly or in part for it.

(2) If it is an imitation of any other article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

20502.

Every person who adulterates or dilutes any article mentioned in this chapter and sells or offers for sale the same so diluted or adulterated, as undiluted and unadulterated, every person who sells or offers for sale a different article without informing the purchaser of such difference, and every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 48.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Video Arcades [20600. - 20602.]

20600.

A video arcade shall post a sign that notifies consumers that a video arcade game rating system, created by the video arcade gaming industry, is available to aid in the selection of a game. This sign shall be posted on the wall of the arcade in a prominent area such as the arcade entrance, the money exchange machine, or the token counter. The lettering of each sign shall be printed, at a minimum, in 36-point type and shall be in black ink against a light colored background, with dimensions no less than 18 by 24 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 748, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20601.

A video arcade shall make available upon request a brochure to consumers that explains the rating system described in Section 20600.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 748, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20602.

For the purposes of this chapter, “video arcade” means any premises where all of the following exist:

(a) Minors are legally permitted to conduct business.

(b) Ten or more video game machines or devices are operated.

(c) One or more of the video game machines or devices are rated “red” or five or more of the video game machines or devices are rated “yellow” under the rating system created by the video arcade gaming industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 748, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.7. Video Games [20650. - 20650.]

20650.

(a) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Video game retailer” means a person who sells or rents video games to the public.

(2) “Video game” means an object or device that stores recorded data or instructions, receives data or instructions generated by a person who uses it, and, by processing the data or instructions, creates an interactive game capable of being played, viewed, or experienced on or through a computer, gaming system, console, or other technology.

(b) Every video game retailer shall post a sign providing information to consumers about a video game rating system or notifying consumers that a rating system is available to aid in the selection of a game. The sign shall be posted within the retail establishment in a prominent area.

(c) A video game retailer shall make available to consumers, upon request, information that explains the video game rating system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Industrial Hygienist Definition and Registration Act [20700. - 20705.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [20700. - 20700.]

20700.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Industrial hygiene” means the science and art devoted to the anticipation, recognition, evaluation, and control of environmental factors or stresses which may cause sickness, impaired health and well-being, or significant discomfort and inefficiency among workers or among the citizens of a community.

(b) “Certified industrial hygienist (CIH)” means a person who has met the education, experience, and examination requirements of an industrial hygiene certification organization.

(c) “Industrial hygiene certification organization” means a professional organization of certified industrial hygienists that has been established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession of industrial hygiene through a certification process, by certifying industrial hygienists through an examination administered by the certification organization. The organization shall have the certifying examinations evaluated by a national testing service and shall maintain certification criteria that are at least the equivalent of the American Board of Industrial Hygiene.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Certification Stamp [20701. - 20702.]

20701.

A certified industrial hygienist may obtain a stamp from an industrial hygiene certification organization, which shall include a number that uniquely identifies and bears the name of that certified industrial hygienist. The stamp certifies that the industrial hygienist has successfully passed an industrial hygiene examination and met the certification maintenance requirements required and approved by the industrial hygiene certification organization .

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20702.

All reports, opinions, or official documents prepared for submission to an employer, government agency, or other consumer by any certified industrial hygienist shall be affixed by a stamp, as specified in Section 20701, and signed by that certified industrial hygienist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Professional Practice [20703. - 20703.]

20703.

No entity of state or local government shall by rule or otherwise regulate the practice of industrial hygiene by any certified industrial hygienist, except where authorized by state statute to regulate a specific activity that may include the practice of industrial hygiene.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Unfair Business Practices [20704. - 20704.]

20704.

It is an unfair business practice for any person to represent themselves as a “certified industrial hygienist” or a “CIH” unless they comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exemptions [20705. - 20705.]

20705.

This act shall not prohibit:

(a) Any person legally regulated in this state under any other licensing act or regulation from engaging in the activities permitted under his or her license, provided he or she does not represent himself or herself as a certified industrial hygienist or CIH.

(b) Professional experience or apprenticeship performed in order to meet certification requirements in this chapter.

(c) The practice of a student pursuing a course of professional education under the terms of this chapter, if these activities and services constitute a part of the student’s supervised course of study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Franchises [20999. - 20999.4.]

20999.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Franchise” means any contract between a refiner and a distributor, between a refiner and a retailer, between a distributor and another distributor, or between a distributor and a retailer, under which a refiner or distributor authorizes or permits a retailer or distributor to use, in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel, a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such use. The term “franchise” includes the following:

(1) Any contract under which a retailer or distributor is authorized or permitted to occupy leased marketing premises, which premises are to be employed in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel under a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such occupancy.

(2) Any contract pertaining to the supply of fuel which is to be sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned or controlled by a refiner, or under a contract which has existed continuously since May 15, 1973, and pursuant to which, on May 15, 1973, fuel was sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned and controlled on such date by a refiner.

(3) The unexpired portion of any franchise, as defined by the preceding provisions of this paragraph, which is transferred or assigned as authorized by the provisions of such franchise or by any applicable provision of state law which permits such transfer or assignment without regard to any provision of the franchise.

(b) “Franchise relationship” means the respective fuel marketing or distribution obligations and responsibilities of a franchisor and a franchisee which result from the marketing of fuel under a franchise.

(c) “Franchisor” means a refiner or distributor who authorizes or permits, under a franchise, a retailer or distributor to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(d) “Franchisee” means a retailer or distributor who is authorized or permitted, under a franchise, to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(e) “Refiner” means any person engaged in the refining of crude oil to produce fuel, and includes any affiliate of such person.

(f) “Distributor” means any person, including any affiliate of such person, who either purchases fuel for sale, consignment, or distribution to another, or receives fuel on consignment for consignment or distribution to his or her own fuel accounts or to accounts of his or her supplier, but shall not include a person who is an employee of, or merely serves as a common carrier providing transportation service for, such supplier.

(g) “Retailer” means any person who purchases fuel for sale to the general public for ultimate consumption.

(h) “Marketing premises” means, in the case of any franchise, premises which, under such franchise, are to be employed by the franchisee in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(i) “Leased marketing premises” means marketing premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled by a franchisor and which the franchisee is authorized or permitted, under the franchise, to employ in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(j) “Contract” means any oral or written agreement. For supply purposes, delivery levels during the same month of the previous year shall be prima facie evidence of an agreement to deliver such levels.

(k) “Trademark” means any trademark, trade name, service mark, or other identifying symbol or name.

(l) “Fuel” means gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel.

(m) “Failure” does not include any failure for a cause beyond the reasonable control of either the franchise relationship or the franchisee.

(n) “Fail to renew” and “nonrenewal” mean, with respect to any franchise relationship, a failure to reinstate, continue, or extend the franchise relationship at any of the following times:

(1) At the conclusion of the term, or on the expiration date, stated in the relevant franchise.

(2) At any time, in the case of the relevant franchise which does not state a term of duration or an expiration date.

(3) Following a termination, on or after the effective date of this act, of the relevant franchise which was entered into prior to the effective date of this act and has not been renewed after that date.

(o) “Affiliate” means any person who, other than by means of a franchise, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any other person.

(p) “Relevant geographic market area” includes this state or a standard metropolitan statistical area within this state which has been established by the United States Office of Management and Budget.

(q) “Termination” includes cancellation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20999.1.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise, no franchisor shall terminate, cancel, or fail to or refuse to renew any existing franchise without good cause.

As used in this section good cause is limited to the following:

(a) The gasoline dealer or petroleum distributor failed to comply with essential and reasonable requirements of the franchise agreement;

(b) The gasoline dealer or petroleum distributor failed to act in good faith in carrying out the terms of the franchise; or

(c) The franchisor is withdrawing from the marketing location at which the franchise of a gasoline dealer is located, provided that the franchisor pays the gasoline dealer the current wholesale market value for all qualifying equipment and supplies purchased by the gasoline dealer from the franchisor or affiliate of the franchisor. This subdivision shall only apply to those gasoline dealer franchises which are entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 1979. As used in this subdivision, “qualifying equipment and supplies” means all equipment and supplies purchased by the gasoline dealer from the franchisor or an affiliate of the franchisor which is free and clear of all liens, security interests and other encumbrances, valued on a first-in, first-out basis, evidenced by receipted invoices, and is (i) in first-class and resalable condition, (ii) in the original packages or containers and (iii) bears the original labels and trademarks, and (iv) the goods display no evidence of deterioration. This subdivision shall not be construed to create any priority over any other debt between the parties to the franchise arising from the same franchise agreement.

(d) For other legitimate business reasons (except that a termination, or cancellation of a franchise for the purpose of enabling the petroleum distributor or manufacturer to assume operation of the distributor’s or gasoline dealer’s business shall not be considered to be a legitimate business reason unless the gasoline dealer or distributor is paid reasonable compensation for the value of his franchise, including a reasonable amount for goodwill).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20999.2.

No petroleum distributor shall deny to any gasoline dealer or prospective gasoline dealer the right to be accompanied by counsel or a personal representative to any meeting held between the parties for the purpose of negotiating the terms of a franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

20999.25.

(a) In the case of leased marketing premises as to which the franchisor owns a fee interest, the franchisor shall not sell, transfer, or assign to another person the franchisor’s interest in the premises unless the franchisor has first either made a bona fide offer to sell, transfer, or assign to the franchisee the franchisor’s interest in the premises, other than signs displaying the franchisor’s insignia and any other trademarked, servicemarked, copyrighted or patented items of the franchisor, or, if applicable, offered to the franchisee a right of first refusal of any bona fide offer acceptable to the franchisor made by another to purchase the franchisor’s interest in the premises.

(b) In the case of leased marketing premises which the franchisor leases from a third party, following notice by the franchisor to the franchisee of termination or nonrenewal of the franchise by reason of the expiration of the franchisor’s underlying lease from the third party, the franchisor shall, upon request by the franchisee and subject to the franchisee purchasing or leasing the premises from the third party prior to the date of termination or nonrenewal of the franchise set forth in the notice, make a bona fide offer to sell to the franchisee any interest the franchisor may have in the improvements on the premises, other than signs displaying the franchisor’s insignia and any other trademarked, servicemarked, copyrighted or patented items of the franchisor, at a price not to exceed the fair market value of the improvements or the book value, whichever is greater, or, if applicable, offer the franchisee a right of first refusal of any bona fide offer acceptable to the franchisor made by another to purchase the franchisor’s interest in the improvements. For the purposes of this subdivision, “book value” means actual cost less actual depreciation taken.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require a franchisor to continue an existing franchise agreement or to renew a franchise relationship if not otherwise required by federal law.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Marketing premises” means, in the case of any franchise, premises which, under such franchise, are to be employed by the franchisee in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of motor fuel.

(2) “Leased marketing premises” means marketing premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled by a franchisor and which the franchisee is authorized or permitted, under the franchise, to employ in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of motor fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20999.3.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter may be sued in the superior court in the county in which the defendant resides or where a franchise affected by the violation does business, for temporary and permanent injunctive relief and for damages, if any, and the costs of suit.

(b) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under any provision of this chapter unless brought before the expiration of two years after the violation upon which it is based or the expiration of one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the facts constituting such violation, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20999.4.

At such time as a franchisor intends to withdraw from the marketing of fuel through retail and distribution outlets in the relevant geographic market area, prompt notification, together with a plan describing the schedule and conditions of the withdrawal, shall be provided by the franchisor to the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.8. Franchise Dealers Fair Practices [21140. - 21149.]

21140.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Franchise” means any contract between a refiner and a distributor, between a refiner and a retailer, between a distributor and another distributor, or between a distributor and a retailer, under which a refiner or distributor authorizes or permits a retailer or distributor to use, in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel, a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such use. The term “franchise” includes the following:

(1) Any contract under which a retailer or distributor is authorized or permitted to occupy leased marketing premises, which premises are to be employed in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel under a trademark which is owned or controlled by such refiner or by a refiner which supplies fuel to the distributor which authorizes or permits such occupancy.

(2) Any contract pertaining to the supply of fuel which is to be sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned or controlled by a refiner, or under a contract which has existed continuously since May 15, 1973, and pursuant to which, on May 15, 1973, fuel was sold, consigned, or distributed under a trademark owned and controlled on such date by a refiner.

(3) The unexpired portion of any franchise, as defined by the preceding provisions of this paragraph, which is transferred or assigned as authorized by the provisions of such franchise or by any applicable provision of state law which permits such transfer or assignment without regard to any provision of the franchise.

(b) “Franchisor” means a refiner or distributor who authorizes or permits, under a franchise, a retailer or distributor to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(c) “Franchisee” means a retailer or distributor who is authorized or permitted, under a franchise, to use a trademark in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(d) “Refiner” means any person engaged in the refining of crude oil to produce fuel, and includes any affiliate of such person.

(e) “Distributor” means any person, including any affiliate of such person, who either purchases fuel for sale, consignment, or distribution to another, or receives fuel on consignment for consignment or distribution to his or her own fuel accounts or to accounts of his or her supplier, but shall not include a person who is an employee of, or merely serves as a common carrier providing transportation service for, such supplier.

(f) “Retailer” means any person who purchases fuel for sale to the general public for ultimate consumption.

(g) “Marketing premises” means, in the case of any franchise, premises which, under such franchise, are to be employed by the franchisee in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(h) “Leased marketing premises” means marketing premises owned, leased, or in any way controlled by a franchisor and which the franchisee is authorized or permitted, under the franchise, to employ in connection with the sale, consignment, or distribution of fuel.

(i) “Contract” means any oral or written agreement. For supply purposes, delivery levels during the same month of the previous year shall be prima facie evidence of an agreement to deliver such levels.

(j) “Trademark” means any trademark, trade name, service mark, or other identifying symbol or name.

(k) “Fuel” means gasoline, diesel, gasohol, or aviation fuel.

(l) “Affiliate” means any person who, other than by means of a franchise, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any other person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 90, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21140.1.
